Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.050

Kindling of fires by persons driving lumber.

Persons engaged in driving lumber upon any waters or streams of this state, may kindle fires when necessary for the purposes in which they are engaged, but shall be bound to use the utmost caution to prevent the same from spreading and doing damage; and if they fail so to do, they shall be subject to all liabilities and penalties of RCW 4.24.040, 4.24.050, and 4.24.060, in the same manner as if the privilege granted by this section had not been allowed.

[ 1983 c 3 s 4; Code 1881 s 1228; 1877 p 300 s 5; RRS s 5648.]